Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. HISTORY, CULTURE, AND EDUCATION

For expiration of this chapter, see Section 451.007.

CHAPTER 451. TEXAS 1836 PROJECT

Sec. 451.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "1836 Project" means the advisory committee established under this chapter.

(2) "Patriotic education" includes the:

(A) presentation of the history of this state's founding and foundational principles;

(B) examination of how this state has grown closer to those principles throughout its history; and

(C) explanation of why commitment to those principles is beneficial and justified.

(3) "State agency" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the executive branch of state government that is created by the constitution or a statute of this state.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.002. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) The 1836 Project is established as an advisory committee to promote patriotic education and increase awareness of the Texas values that continue to stimulate boundless prosperity across this state.

(b) The 1836 Project is composed of nine members reflective of the diversity of the state. The governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint three members. The appointees may include persons in the private sector with relevant experience or subject matter expertise.

(c) Members serve two-year terms and may not be removed except for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance.

(d) The governor shall appoint one member of the 1836 Project as the presiding officer.

(e) The presiding officer shall:

(1) convene regular meetings of the 1836 Project; and

(2) coordinate and direct the activities of the 1836 Project.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.003. DUTIES. (a) The 1836 Project shall:

(1) promote awareness among residents of this state of the following as they relate to the history of prosperity and democratic freedom in this state:

(A) Texas history, including the indigenous peoples of this state, the Spanish and Mexican heritage of this state, Tejanos, the African-American heritage of this state, the Texas War for Independence, Juneteenth, annexation of Texas by the United States, the Christian heritage of this state, and this state's heritage of keeping and bearing firearms in defense of life and liberty and for use in hunting;

(B) the founding documents of this state;

(C) the founders of this state;

(D) state civics; and

(E) the role of this state in passing and reauthorizing the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Section 10101 et seq.), highlighting:

(i) President Lyndon B. Johnson's signing of the act;

(ii) President George W. Bush's 25-year extension of the act; and

(iii) Congresswoman Barbara Jordan's successful efforts to broaden the act to include Spanish-speaking communities;

(2) advise the governor on the core principles of the founding of this state and how those principles further enrich the lives of its residents;

(3) facilitate the development and implementation of the Gubernatorial 1836 Award to recognize student knowledge of Texas Independence and other items listed in Subdivisions (1)(A)-(D);

(4) advise state agencies with regard to their efforts to ensure patriotic education is provided to the public at state parks, battlefields, monuments, museums, installations, landmarks, cemeteries, and other places important to the Texas War for Independence and founding of this state, as appropriate and consistent with applicable law; and

(5) facilitate, advise on, and promote other activities to support public knowledge of and patriotic education on the Texas War for Independence and founding of this state, as appropriate and consistent with applicable law.

(b) In carrying out its duties under Subsection (a)(2), the project may solicit statements and contributions from intellectual and cultural figures.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.004. FUNDING; COMPENSATION. (a) The Texas Education Agency shall provide funding and administrative support for the 1836 Project, including for the pamphlets described by Section 451.005, to the extent funds are available for those purposes.

(b) A member of the 1836 Project is not entitled to compensation but is entitled to reimbursement for the travel expenses incurred by the member while transacting project business, as provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.005. PAMPHLET. Not later than September 1, 2022, the 1836 Project shall provide a pamphlet to the Texas Department of Public Safety that explains the significance of policy decisions made by this state that promote liberty and freedom for businesses and families. The contents must include:

(1) an overview of Texas history and civics;

(2) the legacy of economic prosperity in this state; and

(3) the abundant opportunities for businesses and families in this state.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.006. REPORT. (a) Not later than September 1, 2022, the 1836 Project shall prepare and produce a written report that includes:

(1) a description of the activities of the project;

(2) the findings and recommendations of the project;

(3) a plan that identifies the best method of carrying out the duties under Sections 451.003(a)(1), (4), and (5);

(4) any proposals for legislation; and

(5) any other matter the project considers appropriate.

(b) Subsequent to the report required under Subsection (a), the 1836 Project may prepare and produce additional reports the project considers appropriate.

(c) The Texas Education Agency shall make a report described by this section available to the public on the agency's Internet website.

(d) To the extent existing agency resources are available for this purpose, the Texas Education Agency may provide to the 1836 Project any agency resources necessary to prepare or produce a report described by this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 451.007. ABOLITION; EXPIRATION. The 1836 Project is abolished and this chapter expires September 1, 2036.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.